New Jersey, session 222, S3294.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The Secretary of Higher Education, in consultation with the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development and the New Jersey Presidents Council, shall develop a career and education guide for postsecondary students with disabilities.  The guide shall include information for undergraduate and graduate students with disabilities on available resources at institutions of higher education that support both the academic goals and future career paths of students. The career and education guide shall: (1)  identify the availability of, at each institution of higher education in the State: (a)  disability career centers, career counseling, and placement services; (b)   work-based learning options for students with disabilities, including internships, cooperative learning experiences, and independent study opportunities; and (c)  accommodations and supports such as note-taker services, exam accommodations, accessible seating, communication accommodations, specialty textbooks and equipment, accessible parking, housing and dining areas, and student groups; (2)  provide broad-based career planning information and guidance for undergraduate and graduate students with disabilities on: (a)  when, if, and how a student with a disability may disclose their disability with a prospective employer; (b)  how to negotiate and request reasonable accommodations on the job; (c)  workers rights for employees with disabilities; and (d)  assistive technologies and other supports available to accommodate persons in the workplace; and (3)  detail a list of national and regional organizations, including contact information and websites, specifically tailored to meet the unique challenges of job seekers with disabilities. b.    The Office of the Secretary of Higher Education shall make the guide developed pursuant to this section publicly available on its website. 2.  This act shall take effect on the 90th day after the date of enactment.